nlp/Scripts/tsearch_data_polish/polish.affix
flag *v:

        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCY
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCYCH
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCYM
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCYMI
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCE
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCEGO
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCEJ
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCEMU
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCA
        C I E C                 >       -C,KNĄCĄ


        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCY
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYCH
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYM
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYMI
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCE
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEGO
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEMU
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEJ
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCA
        M I E Ś Ć               >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCĄ


        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCY
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCYCH
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCYM
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCYMI
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCE
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCEGO
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCEMU
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCEJ
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCA
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OGĄCĄ

        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCY
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCYCH
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCYM
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCYMI
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCE
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCEGO
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCEMU
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCEJ
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCA
        [PR] A Ś Ć              >       -ŚĆ,DNĄCĄ

        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCY
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCYCH
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCYM
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCYMI
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCE
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCEGO
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCEMU
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCEJ
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCA
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,KĄCĄ

        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCY
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCYCH
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCYM
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCYMI
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCE
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCEGO
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCEMU
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCEJ
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCA
        L E C                   >       -C,KĄCĄ

        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCY
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYCH
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYM
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYMI
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCE
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEGO
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEMU
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEJ
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCA
        L E Ś Ć                 >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCĄ

        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCY
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCYCH
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCYM
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCYMI
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCE
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCEGO
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCEJ
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCEMU
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCA
        J E Ś Ć                 >       -ŚĆ,DZĄCĄ

        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCY
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYCH
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYM
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCYMI
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCE
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEGO
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEMU
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCEJ
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCA
        G N I E Ś Ć             >       -EŚĆ,OTĄCĄ

        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCY
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCEGO
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCEMU
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCYCH
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCYM
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCYMI
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCA
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCE
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCĄ
        [^BMRTW] Y Ć            >       -YĆ,ĄCEJ

        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCY
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCEGO
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCEMU
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCYCH
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCYM
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCYMI
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCA
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCE
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCĄ
        [MRTW] Y Ć              >       -Ć,JĄCEJ

        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCY
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCYCH
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCYM
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCYMI
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCE
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCEGO
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCEMU
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCEJ
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCA
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,ĄCĄ

        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCY
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCYCH
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCYM
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCYMI
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCE
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCEGO
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCEMU
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCEJ
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCA
        [AEO] I Ć               >       -IĆ,JĄCĄ

        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCY
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCYCH
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCYM
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCYMI
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCE
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCEGO
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCEMU
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCEJ
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCA
        [^Ź] [^AĘOR] Z I Ć      >       -IĆ,ĄCĄ

        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCY
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCYCH
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCYM
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCYMI
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCE
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCEGO
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCEMU
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCEJ
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCA
        Ź D Z I Ć               >       -ŹDZIĆ,ŻDŻĄCĄ

        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCY
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCYCH
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCYM
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCYMI
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCE
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCEGO
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCEMU
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCEJ
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCA
        [AĘOR] Z I Ć            >       -ZIĆ,ŻĄCĄ

        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCY
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCYCH
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCYM
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCYMI
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCE
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCEGO
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCEMU
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCEJ
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCA
        L I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ĄCĄ

        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCY
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCYCH
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCYM
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCYMI
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCE
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCEGO
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCEMU
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCEJ
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCA
        [^ŚZ] C I Ć             >       -IĆ,ĄCĄ

        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCY
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCYCH
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCYM
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCYMI
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCE
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCEGO
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCEMU
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCEJ
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCA
        Z C I Ć                 >       -IĆ,ZĄCĄ

        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCY
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCYCH
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCYM
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCYMI
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCE
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCEGO
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCEMU
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCEJ
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCA
        S I Ć                   >       -IĆ,ZĄCĄ

        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCY
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCYCH
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCYM
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCYMI
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCE
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCEGO
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCEMU
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCEJ
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCA
        Ś C I Ć                 >       -ŚCIĆ,SZCZĄCĄ

        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCY
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCYCH
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCYM
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCYMI
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCE
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCEGO
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCEMU
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCEJ
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCA
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZŻ] A Ć >       -Ć,JĄCĄ

        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCY
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCYCH
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCYM
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCYMI
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCE
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCEGO
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCEMU
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCEJ
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCA
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CZĄCĄ

        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CĄCY
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CĄCYCH
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CĄCYM
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CĄCYMI
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CĄCE
        Ł T A Ć                 >       -TAĆ,CĄCEGO
